Lecture6/en_adjectives.xfst
! Read lexicon and make a regex of it
read lexc en_adjectives.lexc
define Lexicon ;

define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u | y ] ;
define Cons  [ b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m |
               n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z ] ;

! y/i alternation
define YToI     y -> i || _ %^ e ;

! Consonant reduplication
define DoubleCons d -> d d ,
                  g -> g g ,
		  m -> m m ,
		  t -> t t || Cons Vowel _ %^ e ;

! Last rule cleans away the boundary marker
define CleanUp  %^ -> 0 ;

! Compose lexicon with rules
regex Lexicon .o. YToI .o. DoubleCons .o. CleanUp ;

! Output all surface forms of the words
! lower-words

save stack en_adjectives.xfst.hfst
